Utah statutes.
34-20-12.   Willful interference -- Penalty.

Any person who shall willfully resist, prevent, impede or interfere with any member of the board, or any of its agents or agencies, in the performance of duties pursuant to this act shall be punished by a fine of not more than $5,000, or by imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.



Enacted by Chapter 85, 1969 General Session

